Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 4 Proceedings Involving the Department of Banking and Finance

7-1-90.
Judicial review of department actions.

Any final action of the department or refusal of the department to act may be subject to judicial review by any person or corporation affected by such action. Such action shall be brought within 60 days of the final action or refusal of action by the department as a special statutory proceeding in the county in which the affected person or corporation resides or is domiciled if within this state (which in the case of a corporation shall be the county of its registered office if it has such an office) or in Fulton County if the affected person or corporation resides or is domiciled outside of this state. The review shall be conducted by the court without a jury. The court shall not substitute its judgment for that of the department but may:

Compel department action unlawfully withheld; or

Hold unlawful and set aside department action found to be:

In violation of constitutional or statutory provision;

In excess of statutory authority;

Made upon unlawful procedure; or

Arbitrary, capricious, or otherwise in abuse of discretion,

provided that any action reviewable under Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” or through the injunction procedure of Code Section 7-1-155 shall be reviewed under that chapter or Code section and not under this Code section.

Appeals from all final orders and judgments entered by the superior court under this Code section may be taken to the Court of Appeals or the Supreme Court in the same manner as in other cases.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-401, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 9; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1366, § 3.

7-1-91.
Orders by department; enforcement; civil penalty.

Whenever it shall appear to the department that the capital stock of a financial institution has been reduced below the minimum required by law or below the amount required by its articles, the department may issue a written order directing such corporation to restore the deficiency within such period as shall be specified in the order.

Whenever it shall appear to the department that any financial institution is not keeping its books and accounts in such manner as to enable the department, with reasonable facility, to ascertain the true condition of the financial institution, the department may issue a written order requiring such financial institution, within such period as shall be specified in the order, to open and keep such books as the department may, in its discretion, reasonably determine are essential for the purpose of keeping accurate and convenient records of the transactions and accounts of such financial institution.

Whenever any financial institution shall refuse to submit its records and affairs to a legally conducted examination or investigation by the department, the department may issue a written order requiring such financial institution to permit the commissioner or other duly authorized examiner to make such examination or investigation, within such period as shall be specified in the order.

Whenever it shall appear to the department that any financial institution has violated its articles or any law of this state or any order or regulation of the department or that any financial institution is conducting business in an unsafe or unauthorized manner, the department may issue a written order requiring the financial institution to cease and desist from such unsafe and unauthorized practices.

Whenever a financial institution shall fail to comply with the terms of an order of the department which has been properly issued under the circumstances, the department, upon notice of three days to the financial institution, may, through the Attorney General, petition the principal court for an order directing the financial institution to obey the order of the department within such period as shall be fixed by the court. Upon the filing of such petition, the court shall allow a rule to show cause why it should not be granted. Whenever, after a hearing upon the merits or after failure of the financial institution to appear when ordered, it shall appear that the order of the department was properly issued, the court shall grant the petition of the department.

Any financial institution which violates the terms of any order issued pursuant to this Code section shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000.00. Each day during which the violation continues shall constitute a separate offense. In determining the amount of penalty, the department shall take into account the appropriateness of the penalty relative to the size of the financial resources of the institution, the good faith efforts of the financial institution to comply with the order, the gravity of the violation, the history of previous violations by the financial institution, and such other factors or circumstances as shall have contributed to the violation. The department may at its discretion compromise, modify, or refund any penalty which is subject to imposition or has been imposed pursuant to this Code section. The financial institution or other person assessed as provided in this subsection shall have the right to request a hearing into the matter within ten days after notification of the assessment has been served upon the financial institution involved; otherwise, such penalty shall be final except as to judicial review as provided in Code Section 7-1-90.

All penalties recovered by the department pursuant to this Code section shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the general fund; provided, however, that the department at its discretion may remit such amounts recovered, net of the cost of recovery, in the same manner as prescribed for judgments received through derivative actions pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 7-1-441.

The term “financial institution” as used in this Code section shall include a bank holding company as defined in Code Section 7-1-605 and those entities required to be licensed pursuant to Article 4A of this chapter and any officer, director, employee, agent, or other person participating in the conduct of the affairs of the financial institution subject to the orders issued pursuant to this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 5, § 1; Code 1933, § 13-601; Code 1933, § 41A-402, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 10; Ga. L. 1985, p. 258, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 8; Ga. L. 2009, p. 86, § 3/HB 141; Ga. L. 2017, p. 193, § 4/HB 143.

Cross references.

Issuance of subpoenas for production of books and papers pursuant to examinations and investigations of financial institutions, §

7-1-66

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, a comma was deleted following “written order” in subsection (b), and “institution” was substituted for “institutions” the last time that word appears in the third sentence of subsection (f).

7-1-92.
Forfeiture proceedings.

Articles of financial institutions existing under the laws of this state are subject to forfeiture:

In the case of an institution subject to such requirements, for failure to file its annual report with the Secretary of State or its annual license or occupation tax return within the time required by law;

For failure to maintain a registered office in this state as required by the provisions of Title 14, relating to corporations, or by Code Section 7-1-132;

For having procured its articles through fraud;

For failure to organize and proceed to do business within a period of 24 months from the date of the certificate of incorporation;

For failure to obey a final court order issued pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 7-1-91 within the time specified in such order; or

Where, because of violation of law or its articles or the unsafe condition or manner of operation of the financial institution, its continued existence is likely to injure the public or the institution’s creditors or depositors.

Where such grounds exist, the department, through the Attorney General and in the name of the state, is authorized to institute quo warranto or other appropriate proceedings in the principal court to vacate and forfeit the articles of any financial institution.

Where the articles of any financial institution shall be forfeited, the department shall, if it has not already done so, take charge of the business and assets of such institution and proceed to liquidate it in the same manner as is herein provided in cases where the department takes possession of a financial institution directly.

No action to forfeit the articles of any financial institution shall be brought except as provided herein, but any person or corporation shall have the right to submit to the department any facts which under the law would authorize the forfeiture of the articles of a financial institution.

On and after April 1, 1975, the provisions of Title 14, relating to forfeiture, shall not be applicable to financial institutions.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 15, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1925, p. 165, § 10; Code 1933, §§ 13-1601, 13-1602, 13-1603, 13-1604, 25-122; Ga. L. 1935, p. 114, § 1; Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 307, § 7; Ga. L. 1943, p. 279, § 1; Ga. L. 1949, p. 442, § 1; Ga. L. 1956, p. 742, § 4; Ga. L. 1960, p. 977, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 74, § 3; Ga. L. 1968, p. 465, § 8; Code 1933, § 41A-403, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 11.

Cross references.

Declaration by Secretary of State of forfeiture of charter of Secretary of State corporations, §

14-4-160

.

7-1-93.
Injunction and other actions by department.

The department may bring an appropriate civil action to enforce any provision of this chapter or regulations issued hereunder, whether by injunction or otherwise, in the superior court of this state having jurisdiction over one or more of the defendants.

History.

Code 1933, § 13-208, enacted by Ga. L. 1960, p. 67, § 7; Ga. L. 1970, p. 954, § 6; Code 1933, § 41A-404, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-94.
Evidential value of results of examinations or investigations; editing out of information tending to undermine public confidence in financial institution.

When the record of any examination or investigation of a financial institution by the department or the report by the examiner or employee of the department who conducted such examination or investigation is admissible in evidence under Title 24, the department, with the permission of the court, may edit out of the record or report any portion thereof which is not pertinent to the issue in question before the court or which would tend unnecessarily to affect adversely the public confidence in the financial institution.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 2, § 20; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 3, § 10; Ga. L. 1920, p. 102, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 13-320, 13-410; Ga. L. 1966, p. 692, § 27; Code 1933, § 41A-405, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 12; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 5/HB 24.

Cross references.

Hearsay rule exceptions, §

24-8-803

.

Self authentication, §

24-9-902

.

Public records, §

24-10-1005

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Law reviews.

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

7-1-95.
[Reserved] Admissibility of department’s certificates and copies.

History.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 6/HB 24, effective January 1, 2013.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was based on Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 7/HB 90, effective March 13, 2015, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, reserved the designation of this Code section.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2011 repeal of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

7-1-96.
[Reserved] Liability on bonds for nonperformance of duty.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 2, § 21; Code 1933, § 13-321; Code 1933, § 41A-407, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 1-4/HB 811, effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 1-4/HB 811 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2016.

7-1-97.
[Reserved] Costs of actions by or against department.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 2, § 22; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 91; Code 1933, § 13-322; Code 1933, § 41A-408, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 1-4/HB 811, effective July 1, 2016.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 1-4/HB 811 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2016.

7-1-98.
Department of Law to advise department.

It shall be the duty of the Department of Law to advise the department on any question of law submitted by it.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 2, § 23; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 91; Code 1933, § 13-323; Code 1933, § 41A-409, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-99.
Duties and responsibilities of department regarding interest and usury complaints; advisory opinions; effect.

Except as provided in Chapter 3 of this title, as amended, and Chapter 22 of Title 33, as amended, the department is designated as the appropriate agency of this state to receive and investigate complaints or allegations regarding violations of the interest and usury laws of this state. In processing such matters, the department may refer complaints or allegations to other state or federal officials or agencies which have jurisdiction over the lender involved for investigation or other action.

The department, in consultation with the Department of Law, may render and publish advisory opinions for the assistance and guidance of financial institutions as defined in this chapter.

Reliance in good faith upon an opinion issued as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall constitute prima-facie evidence of good faith on the part of any person charged with any violation, resulting from the reliance, which subjects him to forfeiture or other sanctions imposed by the interest and usury laws. The provisions of this paragraph shall apply even if, following the reliance, the opinion is amended, rescinded, or determined by any judicial or other authority to be invalid.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-411, enacted by Ga. L. 1979, p. 951, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 14, § 7.

Law reviews.

For article surveying 1979 legislative developments in commercial law, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 13 (1979).